Washington statutes.
RCW 13.90.070

Right to counsel.

In all proceedings under this chapter to establish, modify, or terminate a vulnerable youth guardianship order, the vulnerable youth and the guardian or prospective guardian have the right to be represented by counsel of their choosing and at their own expense.

[ 2017 c 279 s 9.]